Arkansas, session 2025, HB1802.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 14, Chapter 173, is amended to add an
additional subchapter to read as follows:
Subchapter 2 — Talent Recruitment Grant Program

14-173-201. Definitions.
(1) "Applicant" means an entity applying for a talent
recruitment grant under this subchapter;
(2) "Individual" means a person who:
(A) Resides outside of the state at the time he or she
applies for an incentive under this subchapter; and
(B) Either:
(i) Receives an annual salary of at least fifty-five
thousand dollars ($55,000) for a remote work position in which the person
will continue to be employed after relocating to the state; or
(ii) Has been offered and has accepted an offer of
*JLL285*
03/16/2025 4:40:03 PM JLL285

HB1802
full-time employment in the state; and
(3) "Individual goal" means the total number of individuals an
applicant seeks to successfully incentivize to relocate to a municipality in
the state through a talent recruitment program.

14-173-202. Talent Recruitment Grant Program — Creation and funding.
(a) The Talent Recruitment Grant Program is created to award grants
for talent recruitment programs to incentivize individuals outside of the
state to relocate to municipalities in the state.
(b) The Association of Arkansas Development Organizations shall
administer the program.
(c)(1) The award of grants under this subchapter is contingent on the
availability of funds.
(2) Funding for the program may be from a combination of
federal, state, and private funds, including without limitation:
(A) Any funds authorized or provided for by law;
(B) Contributions from private entities, including without
limitation grants, donations, and investments; and
(C) Other available funding methods, including without
limitation public grants.

14-173-203. Talent recruitment grants.
(a) An applicant shall submit an application to the Association of
Arkansas Development Organizations in the form and manner required by the
association.
(b) To be eligible for a talent recruitment grant under the Talent
Recruitment Grant Program, an applicant shall:
(1) Be either a:
(A) Municipality in the state; or
(B) Nonprofit organization in the state that has a mission
that includes one (1) or more of the following:
(i) Economic development;
(ii) Workforce and talent development; or
(iii) Community development;
(2) Provide a talent recruitment plan that identifies the:
(A) Applicant's proposed incentives and criteria for
03/16/2025 4:40:03 PM JLL285

HB1802
awarding incentives under this subchapter;
(B) Total estimated costs of the applicant's talent
recruitment program, including separate estimates of the costs associated
with the design, administration, marketing, and incentive initiatives of the
talent recruitment program;
(C) Estimated state and local tax impact of the
applicant's talent recruitment program;
(D) Estimated total economic impact of the applicant's
talent recruitment program; and
(E) Applicant's individual goal and the estimated cost of
the talent recruitment program per individual relocated to the state;
(3) Demonstrate the applicant's ability to contribute at least
twenty percent (20%) of the total cost for the applicant's talent recruitment
program, including local investments and in-kind donations; and
(4) If the applicant has previously received a talent
recruitment grant under this subchapter, demonstrate that the applicant met
its individual goal for each previous grant awarded under this subchapter.
(c) After approving an application under this section, the association
shall disburse:
(1) Fifty percent (50%) of the talent recruitment grant award to
the recipient upon approval of the application; and
(2)(A) Fifty percent (50%) of the talent recruitment grant award
to the recipient when the recipient demonstrates that the recipient has
successfully met at least one-half (1/2) of the recipient's individual goal.
(B) If a recipient of a talent recruitment grant under
this subchapter fails to meet at least one-half (1/2) of the recipient's
individual goal, the association shall not disburse the remaining fifty
percent (50%) of the talent recruitment grant award to the recipient.
(d) Talent recruitment grants awarded under this subchapter shall:
(1) Be awarded on an annual basis; and
(2) Not exceed five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) per
applicant in a fiscal year.

14-173-204. Talent recruitment programs — Application for incentives.
(a) An individual may submit an application to a talent recruitment
program established by a recipient of a talent recruitment grant under this
03/16/2025 4:40:03 PM JLL285

HB1802
subchapter for incentives for relocating to the state.
(b) A recipient of a talent recruitment grant under this subchapter
shall approve or deny applications received under this section in accordance
with the talent recruitment plan approved by the Association of Arkansas
Development Organizations.

14-173-205. Reporting requirement.
A recipient of a talent recruitment grant under this subchapter shall
provide quarterly reports to the Association of Arkansas Development
Organizations detailing the following data concerning the outcomes of the
recipient's talent recruitment program:
(1) The total number of applications the talent recruitment
grant recipient received from individuals;
(2) The total number of applications the talent recruitment
grant recipient approved for incentives under § 14-173-204;
(3) The cost of the talent recruitment grant recipient's talent
recruitment program per individual who was approved for incentives under §
14-173-204;
(4) The annual income and the occupation of each individual who
was approved for incentives under § 14-173-204; and
(5) The economic impact of the recipient's talent recruitment
program, including without limitation the total state and local tax revenue
generated from and consumer spending by individuals who were approved for
incentives under § 14-173-204.












03/16/2025 4:40:03 PM JLL285